Montana, session 2025, HB548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Expert witness testimony. Before an expert witness may testify under
Rule 702 of the Montana Rules of Evidence, the court shall determine the following factors:
(1) if the expert's scientific, technical, or other specialized knowledge will help the trier of fact to
understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue;
(2) if the testimony is based on sufficient facts or data;
(3) if the testimony is the product of reliable principles and methods; and
(4) if the expert's opinion reflects a reliable application of the principles and methods to the facts of
the case.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 26, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 26, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 548